Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,180
Beekeeping; liability of beekeeper for acts of agent.

Every person who by agents or representatives shall cause any act to be done in violation of the Nebraska Apiary Act shall be responsible for the acts performed by such agent or representative.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 16, p. 82;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-2716;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,180;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 53.